Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
DEBT AFFORDABILITY STUDY

[§37C-11] Definitions. For the purpose
of this part:

"Ensuing twenty-five fiscal year
period" means the twenty-five fiscal years following the submittal of a
multi-year program and financial plan to the legislature.

"Fiscal years covered by the applicable
multi-year program and financial plan" means the six fiscal years
following the submittal of the multi-year program and financial plan to the
legislature. [L 2015, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next